npfl094/hw-two-level-morphology/german.foma
### german.foma ###

# Vowels
define V [a|e|i|o|u|ä|ö|ü];
# Consonants
define C [b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|x|y|z|B|C|D|F|G|H|J|K|L|M|N|P|Q|R|S|T|V|W|X|Y|Z];

read lexc german.lexc
define Lexicon;

# Insert an "e" after "s" sounds in plural nouns
define EInsertion [..] -> e || [ s | ß | z | x ] _ "^" s ;

# Insert an in superlative adjective after some consonants
define AdjEInsertion [..] -> e || [ d | t | s | ß | x | z ] _ ["@R.SUP@"] "^" [ s t e n ] ;

#define AttSupDeletion [ "am~" ] -> 0 || _ ?* ["@R.SUP"] ;

# N-Declension
# Masculine nouns ending with "-e" add an "n"
#define NDeclMascE e -> e n || _ "^" ;
#define NDeclMascES s -> n || e "^" _ ;
define NDeclEDeletion e -> 0 || _ ("@C.UML@"|"@D.UML@") "^" e n ;

# Delete genitive plural "n" when "en" already ends plural
define NDeletion n -> 0 || e n "^" _ ;

# Umlauts when there is an umlaut flag
define UmlautInsertion a -> ä, o -> ö, u -> ü || \V _ (V) C+ ["@D.UML@"] "^" ( e ( r ) ) ("^" n) ;

# Add umlaut to comparative and superlative adjective degrees for monosyllabic adjectives
# defined here as the first vowel of a single vowel cluster surrounded by consonants
define AdjUmlautInsertion a -> ä, o -> ö, u -> ü || (C) _ (V) \V* ["@R.SUP@"|"@D.SUP@"] "^" ;

define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define Grammar	Lexicon				.o.
				UmlautInsertion		.o.
				AdjUmlautInsertion	.o.
				EInsertion			.o.
				AdjEInsertion		.o.
				NDeclEDeletion		.o.
				NDeletion			.o.
				Cleanup;

regex Grammar;
